New York, session 2025-2026, S9565.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "New York city school-based food pantry act". 3 § 2. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds and declares 4 that a growing number of children in New York city are living in poverty 5 and are experiencing hunger and food insecurity. These conditions are 6 associated with higher rates of chronic absenteeism, difficulty concen- 7 trating in class, behavioral challenges, and lower academic performance. 8 Research further demonstrates that children who are hungry or food inse- 9 cure are less likely to be ready to learn, more likely to experience 10 adverse physical and mental health outcomes, and more likely to fall 11 behind their peers academically. 12 The legislature therefore finds that it is a matter of overriding 13 state concern to ensure that children in the city school district of the 14 city of New York have reliable access to nutritious food in and around 15 the school day, particularly in schools serving communities with the 16 greatest economic need. School-based food pantries, operated in partner- 17 ship with educators, parents, guardians, and community organizations, 18 are a proven means of reducing food insecurity, stabilizing family 19 nutrition, and supporting student learning and well-being. 20 § 3. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2590-w to 21 read as follows: 22 § 2590-w. School-based food pantries in New York city schools. 23 1. Establishment of program. (a) Subject to the availability of funds 24 appropriated for this purpose, the chancellor shall establish and main- 25 tain school-based food pantries in schools throughout the city district. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14243-02-6 S. 9565--A 2 1 (b) School-based food pantries established pursuant to this section 2 shall be located on the premises of a city district school and shall 3 store and distribute nutritious food, without charge, to students 4 enrolled in such school and their parents or persons in parental 5 relation for consumption outside of regular school meals. 6 (c) The chancellor shall prioritize schools serving communities with 7 the highest levels of student economic need, poverty, and food insecuri- 8 ty when determining which schools to establish school-based food 9 pantries in pursuant to this section. The chancellor may use indicators 10 such as the percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-price 11 school meals, the percentage of students who are homeless or in tempo- 12 rary housing, and other measures of concentrated poverty for such food 13 insecurity. 14 2. Operation and schedule. Each school-based food pantry established 15 pursuant to this section shall operate on the premises of the school 16 during designated times during the regular school week, on days when 17 school is in session, but shall not interfere with required instruc- 18 tional time. Each school-based food pantry shall be open and available 19 to students and their parents or persons in parental relation at times 20 reasonably accessible to families, which may include before or after 21 school, not less than two days per week during the regular school week. 22 3. Community partnerships; training and technical assistance. (a) The 23 chancellor shall encourage and facilitate cooperation between schools 24 operating school-based food pantries and local food pantries, food 25 banks, and other community-based organizations with expertise in food 26 distribution and hunger relief. 27 (b) Schools operating school-based food pantries pursuant to this 28 section may enter into written agreements with such local organizations 29 to receive training for school volunteers and to obtain technical 30 assistance related to food safety, inventory management, volunteer 31 management, outreach to families, and related matters. 32 (c) The chancellor may enter into citywide or borough-wide agreements 33 with local or regional food pantries, food banks, or similar organiza- 34 tions to support the establishment and operation of school-based food 35 pantries and to coordinate the donation, purchase, or delivery of food 36 and related supplies. 37 4. Guidance and safeguards. The chancellor shall issue guidance to 38 schools operating food pantries pursuant to this section, which shall 39 include at a minimum: 40 (a) procedures to ensure that students and families are treated with 41 dignity and confidentiality; 42 (b) standards for food safety, storage, and handling, consistent with 43 applicable state and local health and safety requirements; 44 (c) procedures to ensure that school-based food pantry operations do 45 not interfere with instructional time or the safe operation of the 46 school building; 47 (d) encouragement of culturally appropriate and nutritious food 48 options to the extent practicable; and 49 (e) procedures to encourage that school-based food pantries estab- 50 lished pursuant to this section be organized and operated primarily by 51 volunteers. 52 5. Reporting. Commencing with the second school year following the 53 effective date of this section, the chancellor shall annually prepare 54 and submit to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the 55 speaker of the assembly, and the mayor and council of the city of New 56 York, on or before January first, a report that shall include: S. 9565--A 3 1 (a) the number of schools in which school-based food pantries have 2 been established and are operating; 3 (b) the borough and community school district in which each such 4 school is located; 5 (c) the approximate number of students and families served by such 6 pantries during the preceding school year; and 7 (d) a description of any partnerships with local food pantries, food 8 banks, or other community-based organizations that support the operation 9 of school-based food pantries. 10 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 12 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 13 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 14 completed on or before such effective date.